src/fst/affixes/adjectives.lexc
!! Adjective inflection
! --------------------
!! The VÕRO language adjectives compare.


!LEXICON A_
!+A: # ;

LEXICON PROP_PLC-DOWNCASE-SG_GEN
@U.Cap.Opt@+Sg+Gen+Prop→A:@U.Cap.Opt@ # ;

LEXICON A_1HANS1A !!= @CODE@ 1 hanśa:hanśa
:%{back%} NMN_1HANS1A ;

LEXICON A_1HERRAE !!= @CODE@ 1 herrä:herrä
:%{front%} NMN_1HERRAE ;

LEXICON A_2ARTIKLI !!= @CODE@ suhvli:suhvli
!! * Yaml: **suhvli**
:%{back%}   NMN_2ARTIKLI ;

LEXICON A_2KERGE !!= @CODE@ 1 kerge:
:%{front%} NMN_2KERGE ;

LEXICON A_3ALADU !!= @CODE@ aladu:aladu
!! * Yaml: **A-aladu**
:%{back%}   NMN_3ALADU ;
:%{back%}%^Pen%^StrGStem COMP ;

LEXICON A_3PERAEDUE !!= @CODE@ perädü:perädü
!! * Yaml: **A-peraedue**
:%{front%}   NMN_3PERAEDUE ;
:%{front%}%^Pen%^StrGStem COMP ;



!LEXICON A_4TERVUES
!:%{front%}  NMN_4TERVUES ;
LEXICON A_4AINUS  !!= @CODE@ ainus:ainus
:%{back%}  NMN_4AINUS ;
:%{back%}%^CnsRM COMP ;

LEXICON A_5OPPAJA
:%{back%}  NMN_5OPPAJA/MAENGJAE ;
:%{back%} COMP ;

LEXICON A_5MAENGJAE
:%{front%}  NMN_5OPPAJA/MAENGJAE ;
:%{front%} COMP ;

LEXICON A_6MAKW
:%{back%}  NMN_6MAKW/HELLE ;
:%{back%}%^Pen%^WGStem COMP ;

LEXICON A_6HELLE
:%{front%}  NMN_6MAKW/HELLE ;
:%{front%}%^Pen%^WGStem COMP ;


!LEXICON A_7FUEUESIGA
!:%{back%}  NMN_7FUEUESIGA ;

LEXICON A_8KASK
:%{back%}  NMN_8KASK/HAEIELM ;
:%{back%} COMP ;

LEXICON A_8HAEIELM
:%{front%}  NMN_8KASK/HAEIELM ;
:%{front%} COMP ;

LEXICON A_8KULDNW !!= * @CODE@ kuldnõ:kuld
:%{back%}  NMN_8KULDNW/KIIL1NE ;
:%{back%}%>s%{eõ%} Harm_Neutr_COMP ;
+Der+Der/Us+N:%>sus N_4AINUS ; 
LEXICON A_8KIIL1NE !!= * @CODE@ kiiĺne:ki̬i̬ĺ
:%{front%}  NMN_8KULDNW/KIIL1NE ;
:%{front%}%>s%{eõ%} Harm_Neutr_COMP ;
:%>süs N_4TERVUES ;
LEXICON A_8KOLMAS !!= * @CODE@ kolmas:kolma
:%{back%}  NMN_8KOLMAS/VIIES ;

LEXICON A_8VIIES !!= * @CODE@ viies:viie
:%{front%}  NMN_8KOLMAS/VIIES ;

LEXICON A_9ALLAS1 !!= * @CODE@
:%{back%}  NMN_9ALLAS1/SINNEL1 ;
:%{back%}%^Pen%^WGStem%^NoPAL COMP ;

LEXICON A_9SINNEL1 !!= * @CODE@
:%{front%}  NMN_9ALLAS1/SINNEL1 ;
:%{front%}%^Pen%^WGStem%^NoPAL COMP ;

LEXICON A_9TAHHE !!= * @CODE@
:%{back%}  NMN_9TAHHE/HERRE ;
:%{back%}%^Pen%^WGStem%>he COMP ;

LEXICON A_9HERRE !!= * @CODE@
:%{front%}  NMN_9TAHHE/HERRE ;
:%{front%}%^Pen%^WGStem%>he COMP ;

LEXICON A_9KIPWN1/ELLAEI !!= * @CODE@ what is this
!! * Yaml: **ellaei, suhvli**
:     NMN_9KIPWN1/ELLAEI ;
:%^Pen%^WGStem%>%{aä%} Harm_Neutr_COMP ;

LEXICON A_9SALLAI !!= * @CODE@ what is this
!! * Yaml: **ellaei, suhvli**
:%{back%}     NMN_9SALLAI/ELLAEI ;
:%^Pen%^WGStem%>%{aä%} Harm_Neutr_COMP ;
LEXICON A_9KIPWN1
!! * Yaml: **ellaei, suhvli**
:%{back%}     NMN_9KIPWN1/VETEL1 ;
:%{back%}%^Pen%^WGStem%^NoPAL%>a COMP ;

LEXICON A_9VETEL1
!! * Yaml: **ellaei, suhvli**
:%{front%}     NMN_9KIPWN1/VETEL1 ;
:%{front%}%^Pen%^WGStem%^NoPAL%>ä COMP ;

LEXICON A_9ALLWV1
!! * Yaml: **allwv1, kipwn1**
:%{back%}     NMN_9ALLWV1/XX ;
:%{back%}%^Pen%^WGStem%>i COMP ;

LEXICON A_9VILLW
!! * Yaml: **villw**
:%{back%} NMN_9VILLW/XX ;
:%{back%}%^Pen%^WGStem COMP ;

LEXICON A_9TUKWV
!! * Yaml: **tukwv**
:%{back%} NMN_9TUKWV/VERREV ;
:%{back%}%^Pen%^WGStem%>a COMP ;

LEXICON A_9VERREV
!! * Yaml: **verrev**
:%{front%} NMN_9TUKWV/VERREV ;
:%^Pen%^WGStem%>ä%{front%} COMP ;

!LEXICON A_9SALLAI
!! * Yaml: **sallai**
!:%{back%}     NMN_9SALLAI/ELLAEI ;
!:%^Pen%^WGStem%^I2J%>a%{back%} COMP ;

!LEXICON A_9ELLAEI
!!! * Yaml: __ellaei__
!:%{front%}     NMN_9SALLAI/ELLAEI ;
!:%^Pen%^WGStem%^I2J%>ä%{front%} COMP ;

LEXICON A_10AABITS
:%{back%}  NMN_10AABITS/HEERITS ;

LEXICON A_10AMMAT1
:%{back%}  NMN_10AMMAT1 ;

LEXICON A_10HUEPAETS1
:%{front%}  NMN_10HUEPAETS1 ;


LEXICON A_10HEERITS
:%{front%}  NMN_10AABITS/HEERITS ;


LEXICON A_10HWRAK
:%{back%}  NMN_10HWRAK ;

LEXICON A_10HAIDAK
:%{back%}  NMN_10HAIDAK/ESAEK ;

LEXICON A_10ESAEK
:%{back%}  NMN_10HAIDAK/ESAEK-SG ;
:%{front%}  NMN_10HAIDAK/ESAEK_PL ;

!LEXICON A_10RAAMAT
!:%{back%}  NMN_10RAAMAT/LEMBIT ;

!LEXICON A_10LEMBIT
!:%{front%}  NMN_10RAAMAT/LEMBIT ;

!LEXICON A_11LAETEQ
!:%{front%}  NMN_11ANNWQ/LAETEQ ;

LEXICON A_11AINWQ !!= @CODE@ ainõq:ainõ
:%{back%}  NMN_11AINWQ/KELMEQ ;

LEXICON A_11KELMEQ !!= @CODE@ kelmeq:kelme
:%{front%}  NMN_11AINWQ/KELMEQ ;

!LEXICON A_12REPAEN1
!:%{front%}  NMN_12REPAEN1 ;

LEXICON A_13ALONW !!= @CODE@ alonõ:alo
:%{back%}     NMN_13ALONW/TAEHINE ;
+Der+Der/lt+Adv:dsõlt K ;
:%{back%}%>ts%{eõ%} Harm_Neutr_COMP ;
+Der+Der/Us+N:%>dsus N_4AINUS ;
+Err/Orth+Der+Der/Us+N:%>sus N_4AINUS ;

LEXICON A_13TAEHINE !!= @CODE@ tähine:tähi
:%{front%}     NMN_13ALONW/TAEHINE ;
+Der+Der/lt+Adv:dselt K ;
:%{front%}%>ts%{eõ%} Harm_Neutr_COMP ;
+Der+Der/Us+N:%>dsüs N_4TERVUES ;
+Der+Der/Us+N+Err/Orth:%>süs N_4TERVUES ;

LEXICON A_13TAEHINE_PL !!= @CODE@ tähine:tähi
:%{front%}     NMN_13ALONW/TAEHINE_PL ;

!LEXICON A_13SAEAENE !!= @CODE@ sääne:sää
!:%{front%}     NMN_13XX/SAEAENE ;

LEXICON A_14RITS1KAS  !!= @CODE@ ritśkas:ritśka%{sØ%}
:%{back%} Harm_Neutr_COMP ;
:%{back%}  NMN_14RITS1KAS/HERNEH ;

LEXICON A_14HAMMAS  !!= @CODE@ rikas:ri%{kØ%}ka%{sØ%}
:%{back%}%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem%^WGStem COMP ;
:%{back%}  NMN_14HAMMAS/IKAES ;

LEXICON A_14IKAES  !!= @CODE@ rikas:ri%{kØ%}ka%{sØ%}
:%{front%}%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem%^WGStem COMP ;
:%{front%}  NMN_14HAMMAS/IKAES ;

!LEXICON A_15KOTUS
!:%{back%}  NMN_15KOTUS/ILVES ;

LEXICON A_16ABILINW !!= @CODE@ inemine:inemi
:%{back%} NMN_16ABILINW/INEMINE ;
:%{back%}%>s%{eõ%} Harm_Neutr_COMP ;
+Der+Der/Us+N:%>sus N_4AINUS ;
LEXICON A_16INEMINE !!= @CODE@ inemine:inemi
:%{front%} NMN_16ABILINW/INEMINE ;
:%{front%}%>s%{eõ%} Harm_Neutr_COMP ;
:%>süs N_4TERVUES ;

LEXICON A_16TSIRGUKWNW
:%{back%} NMN_16TSIRGUKWNW/TERAEKENE ;
:%{back%}%>s%{eõ%} Harm_Neutr_COMP ;
+Der+Der/Us+N:%>sus N_4AINUS ;

LEXICON A_17ALGUS
:%{back%}     NMN_17ALGUS/UETSUES ;


!LEXICON A_18AIVASTUS
!:%{back%}  NMN_18AIVASTUS/EHITUES ;

!LEXICON A_18EHITUES
!:%{front%}  NMN_18AIVASTUS/EHITUES ;

LEXICON A_19ALOMANW !!= @CODE@ alomanõ:aloma
:%{back%}     A_19ALOMANW/PEDAEJAENE_SG ;
:%{back%}     A_19ALOMANW/PEDAEJAENE_PL ;
:dsõ%{back%} COMP ;
+Der+Der/Us+N:%>dsus N_4AINUS ;

LEXICON A_19PEDAEJAENE !!= @CODE@ pedäjäne:pedäjä
:%{front%} A_19ALOMANW/PEDAEJAENE_SG ;
:%{front%} A_19ALOMANW/PEDAEJAENE_PL ;
:dse%{front%} COMP ;
:%>dsüs N_4TERVUES ;

LEXICON A_19PEDAEJAENE_PL !!= @CODE@ pedäjäne:pedäjä
:%{front%} NMN_19ALOMANW/PEDAEJAENE_PL ;

LEXICON A_19ALOMANW/PEDAEJAENE_SG
:n%{eõ%} Harm_Neutr_SG_NOM ;
+Err/Dial:s Harm_Neutr_SG_NOM ;
:ds%{eõ%}      SG_GEN_ZERO-STEM ;
+Err/Orth:ts%{eõ%}      SG_GEN_ZERO-STEM ;
:s  Harm_Neutr_SG_PAR_t ;
:s         Harm_Neutr_SG_ILL_tE ;

LEXICON A_19ALOMANW/PEDAEJAENE_PL
:ds%{eõ%}      Harm_Neutr_PL_NOM ;
+Err/Orth:ts%{eõ%}      Harm_Neutr_PL_NOM ;
:idsi  PL_GEN_ZERO ;
:idsi  Harm_Neutr_PL_PAR_ZERO ;
:idsi  PL_ILL_he ;
:idsi  PL_ALL_lE-STEM ;
:idsi  PL_COM ;
+Err/Dial:idsi  Harm_Neutr_PL_ILL_ZERO ;
+Err/Dial:idsi  PL_ILL_dE ;
+Err/Dial:itsi  PL_ALL_lE-STEM ;
+Err/Dial:st%{eõ%}  PL_ALL_lE-STEM ;
+Err/Dial:st%{eõ%} PL_COM ;

+Err/Dial:st%{eõ%}  PL_GEN_ZERO ;
+Err/Dial:isi  PL_GEN_ZERO ;!was :idsi CHECKME 2022-02-22
+Err/Dial:isi  Harm_Neutr_PL_PAR_ZERO ;
+Err/Dial:isi  PL_ILL_he ;
+Err/Dial:isi  PL_ALL_lE-STEM ;
+Err/Dial:isi PL_COM ;

LEXICON A_19TUJOKAS
:%{back%} NMN_19TUJOKAS/SILMIKAES ; 
:%{back%}ds%{eõ%} COMP ;
+Der+Der/Us+N:%>dsus N_4AINUS ;

LEXICON A_19SILMIKAES
:%{front%} NMN_19TUJOKAS/SILMIKAES ;
:%{front%}ds%{eõ%} COMP ;
:%>dsüs N_4TERVUES ;

!LEXICON A_20VAEITS1
!:%{front%}  NMN_20VAEITS1 ;

!LEXICON A_21HUEDSI
!:%{front%}  NMN_21HUEDSI ;

LEXICON A_22VWROKWNW !!= @CODE@ võrokõnõ:võrokõ
:%{back%}     NMN_22VWROKWNW/VAEHAEKENE ;
:%{back%}s%{eõ%} COMP ;
+Der+Der/Us+N:%>sus N_4AINUS ;

LEXICON A_22VAEHAEKENE !!= @CODE@ võrokõnõ:võrokõ
:%{front%}     NMN_22VWROKWNW/VAEHAEKENE ;
:%{front%}s%{eõ%} COMP ;
:%>süs N_4TERVUES ;

LEXICON A_23NUUL1
:%{back%}  NMN_23NUUL1/KIIL1 ;
:%{back%}%^VOWLower%^NoPALõ COMP ;
