src/fst/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON adjectives
läülä+A:läülä A_1HERRAE "_#, #t__läülä_" ;
nührü+A:nührü A_1HERRAE "_#, #t__nührü_" ;
pisla+A:pisla A_1HANS1A "_#, #t__pisla_" ;
pümmelilla+A:pümmelilla A_1HANS1A "_#, #t__pümmelilla_" ;
lühkü+A:lühkü A_2KERGE "_#, #t __ˋlühkü_" ;
pittu+A:pittu A_2ARTIKLI "_#, #t__pittu_" ;
värski+A:värski A_2KERGE "_#, #t__ˋvärski_" ;
ütesuuru+A:üte#suuru A_2ARTIKLI "_#, #t __üte%{ˋØ%}suuru_" ;
aladu+A:aladu A_3ALADU "_#du, #tut__ala|du_" ;
perädü+A:perädü A_3PERAEDUE "_#dü, #tüt__perä|dü_" ;
ainus+A:ainus A_4AINUS "_#, #t__ˋainu|s_" ;
kõrksa+A:kõrksa A_5OPPAJA "_#, #t__ˋkõrksa_" ;
lühkü+A:lühkü A_5MAENGJAE "_#, #t __ˋlühkü_" ;
tihkõ+A:tihkõ A_5OPPAJA "_#, #t__ˋtihkõ_" ;
tiidjä+A:ti̬i̬djä A_5MAENGJAE "_#, #t__ti̬i̬djä_" ;
jürre+A:jürre A_6HELLE "_#, t __jür|re_" ;
lakõ+A:la%{kØ%}kõ A_6MAKW "_#, #t__lakõ_" ;
pihtpümme+A:pihtpümme A_6HELLE "_#, #t__pihtpümme_" ;
torrõ+A:torrõ A_6MAKW "_#, #t__torrõ_" ;
ainus+A:ainus A_17ALGUS "_#, #t__ˋainu|s_" ;
alamb+A:alamba A_8KASK "_#a, #at__alamb_" ;
huvitav+A:huvitava A_8KASK "_#a, #at__huvitav_" ;
keskaignõ+A:keskaig A_8KULDNW ;
tuuaignõ+A:tuu#aig A_8KULDNW ;
nättäv+A:nättävä A_8HAEIELM "_#ä, #ät__nättäv_" ;
süüdäv+A:sü̬ü̬dävä A_8HAEIELM "_#ä, #ät__sü̬ü̬däv_" ;
kavvaĺ+A:ka%{vØ%}va%{lĺ%} A_9KIPWN1 "_#ala, #alat__kav|vaĺ_" ;
käpe+A:kä%{pb%}e A_9HERRE "_#behe, #behet__kä|pe_" ;
likõ+A:li%{kg%}õ A_9VILLW "_#gõhõ, #gõhõtt__li|kõ_" ;
lõpus+A:lõ%{pb%}us A_9TUKWV  "_II, #busa, #busat__lõ|pus_" ;
mataĺ+A:ma%{td%}a%{lĺ%} A_9KIPWN1 "_#dala, #dalat__ma|taĺ_" ;
mahhe+A:ma%{hØ%}he A_9TAHHE "_#ehe, #ehet__mah|he_" ;
ossav+A:o%{sØ%}sav A_9TUKWV "_#ava, #avat__os|sav_" ;
pümmeverrev+A:pümmeve%{rØ%}rev A_9VERREV "_#evä, #evät__pümmever|rev_" ;
räpäĺ+A:rä%{pb%}ä%{lĺ%} A_9SINNEL1 "_#i, #it__rä|päĺ_" ;
sille+A:si%{lØ%}le A_9HERRE "_#ehe, #ehet__sil|le_" ;
tsipõ+A:tsi%{pb%}õ A_9VILLW "_#bõhõ, #bõht__tsi|põ_" ;
tśohhe+A:tśo%{hØ%}he A_9TAHHE "_#õhõ, #õhõt__tśoh|he_" ;!Question
täpäŕ+A:tä%{pb%}ä%{rŕ%} A_9VETEL1 "_#bärä, #bärät__tä|päŕ_" ;
veteĺ+A:ve%{td%}e%{lĺ%} A_9VETEL1 "_#delä, #delät__ve|teĺ_" ;
vikuŕ+A:vi%{kg%}u%{rŕ%} A_9ALLAS1 "_#guri, #gurit__vi|kuŕ_" ;
villui+A:vi%{lØ%}lu%{ij%} A_9SALLAI "_#uja, #ujat __vil|lui_" ;
väkev+A:vä%{kg%}ev A_9VERREV "_#gevä, #gevät __vä|kev_" ;
andśak+A:andśa%{kg%} A_10HWRAK "_#ga #gu, #kat #kut__andśa|k_" ;
keebätś+A:keebä%{td%}%{sś%} A_10HUEPAETS1 "_#dsi, #tsit__keebä|tś_" ;
kiibak+A:kiiba%{kg%} A_10HAIDAK "_#gu, #kut__kiiba|k_" ;
lohak+A:loha%{kg%} A_10HAIDAK "_#gu, #kut__loha|k_" ;
loroṕ+A:loro%{pṕb%} A_10AMMAT1 "_#bi, #pit__loro|ṕ_" ;
nutik+A:nuti%{kg%} A_10AABITS "_#ga, #kat__nuti|k_" ;
pislaḱ+A:pisla%{kḱg%} A_10AMMAT1 "_#gi, #kit__pisla|ḱ_" ;
räpäk+A:räpä%{kg%} A_10ESAEK "_#gu, #kut__räpä|k_" ;
vilets+A:vile%{td%}s A_10HEERITS "_#dsä, #tsät__vile|ts_" ;
ütsik+A:ütsi%{kg%} A_10ESAEK "_#gu, #kut__ütsi|k_" ;
ihnõq+A:ihnõ A_11AINWQ "_ˋihnõ, ihnõt__ihnõq_" ;
tehiterveq+A:tehiterve A_11KELMEQ "_#terve, #tervet__tehi|terveq_" ;
tiinõq+A:tiinõ A_11AINWQ "_ˋtiinõ, tiinõt__tiinõq_" ;
kõonõ+A:kõo A_13ALONW "_#dsõ, #st__ˋkõo|nõ_" ;
kärnäne+A:kärnä A_13TAEHINE "_#dse, #st__kärnä|ne_" ;
prälline+A:prälli A_13TAEHINE "_#dse, #st__prälli|ne_" ;
sugunõ+A:sugu A_13ALONW "_#dsõ, #st__#sugu|nõ_" ;
hõdras+A:hõ%{td%}ra%{sØ%} A_14HAMMAS "_ˋhõtra, hõdrast__hõdras_" ;
kitsas+A:kitsa%{sØ%} A_14RITS1KAS "_ˋkitsa, kitsast__kitsas_" ;
maḱas+v2+A:makja%{sØ%} A_14RITS1KAS "_ˋmakja, makjast __makjas_" ;
närväs+A:när%{bv%}ä%{sØ%} A_14IKAES "_ˋnärbä, närväst__närväs_" ;
puhas+A:puh%{tØ%}a%{sØ%} A_14HAMMAS "_ˋpuhta, puhast__puhas_" ;
latsõlinõ+A:latsõli A_16ABILINW "_#dsõ, #st__latsõli|nõ_" ;
alaiäline+A:ala#iäli A_16INEMINE "_#se, #st__ala%{ˋØ%}iäli|ne_" ;
tsilĺokõnõ+A:tsilĺokõ A_16TSIRGUKWNW "_#sõ, #st__tsilĺokõ|nõ_" ;
nalĺalinõ+A:nalĺali A_19ALOMANW "_#dsõ, #st__nalĺali|nõ_" ;
viieline+A:viieli A_19PEDAEJAENE "_#dse, #st__viieli|ne_" ;
ohukõnõ+A:ohukõ A_22VWROKWNW "_#sõ, #ist__ohukõ|nõ_" ;
peenükene+A:peenüke A_22VAEHAEKENE "_#se, #ist __peenüke|ne_" ;
nuuŕ+A:n%{ou%}%{ou%}%{rŕ%} A_23NUUL1 "_noorõ, nu̬u̬rt__nu̬u̬ŕ_" ;
katsas+A:katsa A_8KOLMAS "_#nda, #ndat__ˋkatsa|s_" ;
kuvvõs+A:kuvvõ A_8KOLMAS "_#nda, #ndat__kuvvõ|s_" ;
nelläs+A:nellä A_8VIIES "_#ndä, #ndät__nellä|s_" ;
ütsäs+A:ütsä A_8VIIES "_#ndä, #ndät__ˋütsä|s_" ;
